California statutes. Education Code
(E) Internal audits, on behalf of a community college district, of a provider’s plan compliance procedures with respect to the provider’s annuity contract or custodial account offered under the community college district’s plan. These audits shall not be conducted more than once per year for any provider’s plan unless documented evidence indicates a problem in complying with either Section 403(b) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) If a community college district elects to contract with a third-party administrator for the administrative or compliance services to community college districts described in subdivision (b), the community college district shall do all of the following:

(A) Require the third-party administrator to provide proof of liability insurance and a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the community college district to be sufficient to protect the assets of participants and beneficiaries in the annuity contract and custodial account or deferred compensation plan.

(B) Require the third-party administrator to provide evidence of a safe chain-of-custody of assets process for ensuring fulfillment of fiduciary responsibilities and timely placement of participant investments.

(C) Require evidence, if the third-party administrator is related to or affiliated with a provider of investment products pursuant to Section 403(b) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, that data generated from the services provided by the third-party administrator are maintained in a manner that prevents the provider of investment products from accessing that data unless access to the data is required to provide the services in accordance with the contract entered into with the community college district pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) This subdivision shall apply to any administrative or compliance services provided pursuant to a contract for services between a community college district and the State Teachers’ Retirement System if the system does not contract with a third-party administrator to provide those administrative and compliance services on behalf of the system.

(d) A third-party administrator shall disclose to any community college district seeking his or her services any fees, commissions, cost offsets, reimbursements, or marketing or promotional items received by the administrator, a related entity, or a representative or agent of the administrator or related entity from any plan provider selected as a vendor of an annuity contract, custodial account, or deferred compensation plan by the community college district. A third-party administrator that is affiliated with or has a contractual relationship with a provider of annuity contracts, custodial accounts, or deferred compensation plans shall disclose the existence of the relationship to each community college district and each individual participant in the annuity contract, custodial account or deferred compensation plan.

(e) Any personal information obtained by the third-party administrator in providing services pursuant to this section shall be used by the third-party administrator only to provide those services for the community college district in accordance with the contract entered into with the community college district pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with either of the following:

(1) The rights of employees or beneficiaries as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(2) The ability of the community college district to establish nonarbitrary requirements upon providers of an annuity contract that, in the community college district’s discretion, aid in the administration of its benefit programs and do not unreasonably discriminate against any provider of an annuity contract or interfere with the rights of employees or beneficiaries as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(g) This section shall not apply to any services provided by a third-party administrator pursuant to a contract for services between a community college district and the State Teachers’ Retirement System. Any services provided by a third-party administrator pursuant to a contract for services between a community college district and the State Teachers’ Retirement System shall be subject to either Section 24953, in the case of an annuity contract or custodial account, or Section 24977, in the case of a deferred compensation plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

87042.

Any school employee of a community college district who is absent because of injury or illness which arose out of and in the course of the person’s employment, and for which the person is receiving temporary disability benefits under the workers’ compensation laws of this state, shall not be entitled to receive wages or salary from the district which, when added to the temporary disability benefits, will exceed a full day’s wages or salary.

During such periods of temporary disability so long as the employee has available for the employee’s use sick leave, vacation, compensating time off or other paid leave of absence, the district shall require that temporary disability checks be endorsed payable to the district. The district shall then cause the employee to receive the person’s normal wage or salary less appropriate deductions including but not limited to employee retirement contributions.

When sick leave, vacation, compensating time off or other available paid leave is used in conjunction with temporary disability benefits derived from workers’ compensation, as provided in this section, it shall be reduced only in that amount necessary to provide a full day’s wage or salary when added to the temporary disability benefits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87043.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 87042, 87787 and 88192, a community college district may waive the requirement that temporary disability checks be endorsed payable to the district, and may in lieu thereof, permit the employee to retain his temporary disability check, providing that notice be given to the district that such check has been delivered to the employee. In such cases, the district shall then cause the employee to receive his normal wage or salary less appropriate deductions, including, but not limited to, employee retirement contributions, and an amount equivalent to the face amount of the temporary disability check, which the employee has been permitted to retain. In all cases, employee benefits are to be computed on the basis of the employee’s regular wage or salary prior to the deduction of any amounts for temporary disability payments.

Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to in any way diminish those rights and benefits which are granted to a school employee pursuant to the provisions of Sections 87042, 87787 and 88192.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87044.

When a president or other community college official releases a minor student of such school to a peace officer for the purpose of removing the minor from the school premises, such school official shall take immediate steps to notify the parent, guardian, or responsible relative of the minor regarding the release of the minor to such officer, and regarding the place to which the minor is reportedly being taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87045.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may establish a catastrophic leave program to permit employees of that district to donate eligible leave credits to an employee when that employee or a member of his or her family suffers from a catastrophic illness or injury.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Catastrophic illness” or “injury” means an illness or injury that is expected to incapacitate the employee for an extended period of time, or that incapacitates a member of the employee’s family which incapacity requires the employee to take time off from work for an extended period of time to care for that family member, and taking extended time off work creates a financial hardship for the employee because he or she has exhausted all of his or her sick leave and other paid time off.

(2) “Eligible leave credits” means vacation leave and sick leave accrued to the donating employee.

(b) Eligible leave credits may be donated to an employee for a catastrophic illness or injury if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The employee who is, or whose family member is, suffering from a catastrophic illness or injury requests that eligible leave credits be donated and provides verification of catastrophic injury or illness as required by the governing board of the community college district in which he or she is employed.

(2) The governing board of the community college district determines that the employee is unable to work due to the employee’s or his or her family member’s catastrophic illness or injury.

(3) The employee has exhausted all accrued paid leave credits.

(c) If the transfer of eligible leave credits is approved by the governing board of the community college district, any employee may, upon written notice to the governing board, donate eligible leave credits at a minimum of eight hours, and in hour increments thereafter.

(d) The governing board of a community college district that provides a catastrophic leave program pursuant to this section shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of this section, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The maximum amount of time for which donated leave credits may be used, but not to exceed use for a maximum period of 12 consecutive months.

(2) The verification of catastrophic injury or illness required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) Making all transfers of eligible leave credit irrevocable.

(e) An employee who receives paid leave pursuant to this section shall use any leave credits that he or she continues to accrue on a monthly basis prior to receiving paid leave pursuant to this section.

(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the governing board of a community college district and an exclusive bargaining representative of employees in that district may agree to include in any collective bargaining agreement a provision setting forth requirements for a catastrophic leave program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 78, Sec. 2.   Effective May 20, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Personnel Interchange Between Academic and Classified Positions [87060. - 87062.]

87060.

The purpose of this article is to provide a basis of determination as to what constitutes a supervisory or administrative classified position or an academic position not clearly defined in other sections of this code; to provide an interchange of qualified personnel between the academic and classified services; and to secure rights and benefits to employees moving between the two services, all to the end of assuring better educational systems for the students of the community colleges.

The provisions of this article are not intended, nor may they be construed, to invalidate any other sections of this code which were enacted prior to the enactment of this article, relating to academic positions or the classified service covered in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4 of this part, unless specifically provided herein. This article shall where appropriate apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 22.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87061.

If an employee of a community college district, including a district having the merit system as outlined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4, employed in an academic position is assigned to a position in the classified service of the same district, the employee shall retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical leave, and other rights and benefits. All seniority and tenure rights accumulated by the employee at the time of assignment to the position in the classified service shall be secured to the employee during the period of time he or she occupies a position in the classified service. The employee’s return to academic service at any time shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his or her academic service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 40.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

87062.

If an employee of a community college district, including a district having the merit system as outlined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4, employed in a position in the classified service is assigned to an academic position in the same district, the employee shall retain all sick leave, vacation, and other rights and benefits accumulated by the employee at the time he or she is assigned to an academic position. All seniority and permanency rights shall be secured to the employee during the period of time he or she occupies an academic position. The employee’s return to the classified service at any time shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his or her classified service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 24.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Equal Employment Opportunity Hiring [87100. - 87108.]

87100.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In fulfilling its mission within California’s system of public higher education, the California Community Colleges are committed to academic excellence and to providing all students with the opportunity to succeed in their chosen educational pursuits.

(2) Academic excellence can best be sustained in a climate of acceptance and with the inclusion of persons from a wide variety of backgrounds and preparations to provide service to an increasingly diverse student population.

(3) A work force that is continually responsive to the needs of a diverse student population may be achieved by ensuring that all persons receive an equal opportunity to compete for employment and promotion within the community college districts and by eliminating barriers to equal employment opportunity.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish and maintain within the California Community College districts a policy of equal opportunity in employment for all persons, and to prohibit discrimination or preferential treatment based on ethnic group identification, or on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code. Every aspect of personnel policy and practice in the community college districts should advance the realization of inclusion through a continuing program of equal employment opportunity.

(c) The Legislature recognizes that it is not enough to proclaim that community college districts must not discriminate and must not grant preferential treatment on impermissible bases. The Legislature declares that efforts must also be made to build a community in which nondiscrimination and equal opportunity are realized. It is the intent of the Legislature to require community college districts to adopt and implement programs and plans for ensuring equal employment opportunity in their employment practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

87101.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Equal employment opportunity” means that all qualified individuals have a full and fair opportunity to compete for hiring and promotion and fully enjoy the benefits of employment by a community college district. Ensuring equal employment opportunity is advanced in an inclusive environment that fosters cooperation, acceptance, democracy, and the free expression of ideas. An inclusive environment is welcoming to men and women, persons with disabilities, individuals from all ethnic groups, and individuals from all other groups protected from discrimination by this article.

(b) “Equal employment opportunity plan” means a document that includes specific procedures for achieving equal employment opportunity.

(c) “Equal employment opportunity program” means all the various methods by which equal employment opportunity is ensured. These methods include, but are not necessarily limited to, actively recruiting, using nondiscriminatory employment practices, and monitoring employment practices to ensure equality of opportunity. Each district employer shall commit to sustained action to devise recruiting, training, and advancement opportunities that will result in equal employment opportunities for all qualified applicants and employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87102.

(a) As a condition for the receipt of funds pursuant to Section 87107, the governing board of the community college district that opts to participate under the article shall periodically submit to the board of governors an affirmation of compliance with this article, and, to promote faculty diversity, commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, shall implement strategies from the Multiple Methods identified by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Each participating community college
 district’s equal employment opportunity program shall ensure participation in, and commitment to, the program by community college district personnel. Each participating community college district’s equal employment opportunity plan shall include steps that the community college district will take to eliminate improper discrimination or preferences in its hiring and employment practices. Each plan shall address how the
 community college district will make progress in achieving the ratio of full-time to part-time faculty hiring, as indicated in Section 87482.6, while still ensuring equal employment opportunity.

(b) Each participating community college district’s equal employment opportunity plan is a public record within the meaning of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) To ensure compliance and consistency in the implementation of this article, on or before January 1, 2024, the chancellor’s office shall create a process to verify each participating community college district’s
 proper implementation of strategies from the Multiple Methods identified by the chancellor’s office to promote faculty diversity under the community college district’s equal employment opportunity plan.

(d) The chancellor’s office shall, on or before April 1, 2024, implement a policy to regularly determine the most effective and feasible best practices for participating community college districts to promote faculty diversity under their equal employment opportunity plans. The chancellor’s office shall update the Multiple Methods strategies to include the selected best practices for purposes of evaluating each participating community college district’s equal employment opportunity plan once every three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87103.

(a) The board of governors shall render assistance in developing and implementing equal employment opportunity programs in the community college districts.

(b) To ensure that participating community college districts perform analyses necessary to identify and determine the causes of any underrepresentation in the faculty they hire, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, on or before October 1, 2023, implement a policy to verify that community college districts conduct the demographic analyses of their
 employment processes as required in Section 53023 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 12.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87105.

The board of governors shall adopt all necessary regulations to carry out the intent of this article and to ensure that each participating community college district implements processes for ensuring equal employment opportunities. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require any community college to incur any costs in excess of the funds allocated by the state for the purposes of this act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87106.

(a) The board of governors shall develop systemwide strategies for encouraging community college students to become qualified for, and seek, employment as community college faculty or administrators.

(b) The board of governors shall develop and disseminate to community college districts a model equal employment opportunity plan that accomplishes at least all of the following:

(1) Compliance with the regulations adopted by the board of governors to implement this article.

(2) Compliance with the other applicable state and federal nondiscrimination statutes.

(3) Implementation of the best practices for improving the equality of opportunity.

(4) Encouragement of districts to take steps reasonably calculated to inform their students about the opportunity to participate in the Graduate Assumption Program of Loans for Education authorized by Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69618) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 and to participate in other programs developed by the board of governors pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87107.

In order to support the activities required and authorized by this article, the Employment Opportunity Fund is hereby established. The fund shall include moneys appropriated in the annual Budget Act or provided, pursuant to Section 87482.7, through transfer. The moneys in the fund shall be administered by the board of governors for the purpose of promoting equal employment opportunities in hiring and promotion at community college districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87108.

(a) The board of governors shall adopt regulations for the use of the fund. Those uses may include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Activities designed to encourage community college students to become qualified for, and seek, employment as community college faculty or administrators.

(2) Outreach and recruitment.

(3) In-service training on equal employment opportunities.

(4) Accommodations for applicants and employees with disabilities.

(5) Activities to promote equal employment opportunities and implement the requirements of this article.

(b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may use not more than 25 percent of the revenues in the fund to provide technical assistance, service, monitoring, and compliance functions. Service functions under this subdivision may include, but are not necessarily limited to, the provision of a clearinghouse for advertising community college district job opportunities and for allowing persons seeking jobs to make known their interest in community college employment. This clearinghouse shall include a special emphasis on faculty internship employment opportunities and on reaching students who are qualified for faculty internship programs. The remaining balance in the fund may be allocated to the individual community college districts as prescribed by the board of governors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Community College Faculty and Staff Development Fund [87150. - 87154.]

87150.

There is hereby established the Community College Professional Development Program, to be administered by the board of governors, the purpose of which is to provide state general funds to community colleges for supporting locally developed and implemented faculty and staff development programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   (AB 2558)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

87151.

The board of governors shall annually allocate funds, when appropriated for purposes of this article, only to a community college district whose chief executive officer has submitted to the chancellor an affidavit that includes all of the following:

(a) A statement that each campus within the community college district has an advisory committee, composed of administrators, faculty, and staff representatives, which has assisted in the assessment of the faculty and staff development needs and in the design of the plan to meet those needs.

(b) A campus human development resources plan has been completed for the current and subsequent fiscal
 years.

(c) A report of the actual expenditures for faculty and staff development for the preceding year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (AB 2558)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

87152.

(a) Any funding appropriated for purposes of this article shall be allocated to the community college districts that provide professional development opportunities to both faculty and staff. Funding shall be disbursed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board of governors.

(b) Community college districts that receive funding pursuant to this section shall include the employee’s time used participating in the Community College Professional Development Program in the employee’s contractually obligated hours.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   (AB 2558)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

87153.

The authorized uses of funds allocated under this article shall include all of the following:

(a) Improvement of teaching.

(b) Maintenance of current academic and technical knowledge and skills.

(c) In-service training for vocational education and employment preparation programs.

(d) Retraining to meet changing institutional needs.

(e) Intersegmental exchange programs.

(f) Development of innovations in instructional and administrative techniques and program effectiveness.

(g) Computer and technological proficiency programs.

(h) Courses and training implementing affirmative action and upward mobility programs.

(i) Other activities determined to be related to educational and professional development pursuant to criteria established by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, including, but not necessarily limited to, programs designed to develop self-esteem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

87154.

This article shall be operative during any fiscal year only if funds are provided therefor in the annual Budget Act for that fiscal year or other legislation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reporting by Community College Employees of Improper Governmental Activities [87160. - 87164.]

87160.

This article shall be known and may be referred to as the Reporting by Community College Employees of Improper Governmental Activities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87161.

It is the intent of the Legislature that community college employees and other persons disclose, to the extent not expressly prohibited by law, improper governmental activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87162.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Employee” means a public school employee as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code as construed to include community college employees.

(b) “Illegal order” means any directive to violate or assist in violating a federal, state, or local law, rule, or regulation or an order to work or cause others to work in conditions outside of their line of duty that would unreasonably threaten the health or safety of employees or the public.

(c) “Improper governmental activity” means an activity by a community college or by an employee that is undertaken in the performance of the employee’s official duties, whether or not that activity is within the scope of his or her employment, and that meets either of the following descriptions:

(1) The activity violates a state or federal law or regulation, including, but not limited to, corruption, malfeasance, bribery, theft of government property, fraudulent claims, fraud, coercion, conversion, malicious prosecution, misuse of government property, or willful omission to perform duty.

(2) The activity is economically wasteful or involves gross misconduct, incompetency, or inefficiency.

(d) “Person” means any individual, corporation, trust, association, any state or local government, or any agency or instrumentality of any of the foregoing.

(e) “Protected disclosure” means a good faith communication that discloses or demonstrates an intention to disclose information that may evidence either of the following:

(1) An improper governmental activity.

(2) Any condition that may significantly threaten the health or safety of employees or the public if the disclosure or intention to disclose was made for the purpose of remedying that condition.

(f) “Public school employer” has the same meaning as in subdivision (k) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code as construed to include community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87163.

(a) An employee may not directly or indirectly use or attempt to use the official authority or influence of the employee for the purpose of intimidating, threatening, coercing, commanding, or attempting to intimidate, threaten, coerce, or command any person for the purpose of interfering with the right of that person to disclose to an official agent matters within the scope of this article.

(b) For the purpose of subdivision (a), “use of official authority or influence” includes promising to confer or conferring any benefit; affecting or threatening to affect any reprisal; or taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action, including, but not limited to appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, performance evaluation, suspension, or other disciplinary action.

(c) For the purpose of subdivision (a), “official agent” includes a community college administrator, member of the governing board of a community college district, or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(d) An employee who violates subdivision (a) may be liable in an action for civil damages brought against the employee by the offended party.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an individual to disclose information otherwise prohibited by or under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87164.

(a) An employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer who files a written complaint with his or her supervisor, a community college administrator, or the public school employer alleging actual or attempted acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar improper acts prohibited by Section 87163 for having disclosed improper governmental activities or for refusing to obey an illegal order may also file a copy of the written complaint with the local law enforcement agency, together with a sworn statement that the contents of the written complaint are true, or are believed by the affiant to be true, under penalty of perjury. The complaint filed with the local law enforcement agency shall be filed within 12 months of the most recent act of reprisal that is the subject of the complaint.

(b) A person who intentionally engages in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against an employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer for having made a protected disclosure is subject to a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year. An employee, officer, or administrator who intentionally engages in that conduct shall also be subject to discipline by the public school employer. If no adverse action is instituted by the public school employer, and it is determined that there is reasonable cause to believe that an act of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts prohibited by Section 87163, the local law enforcement agency may report the nature and details of the activity to the governing board of the community college district.

(c) (1) The State Personnel Board shall initiate a hearing or investigation of a written complaint of reprisal or retaliation as prohibited by Section 87163 within 10 working days of its submission. The executive officer of the State Personnel Board shall complete findings of the hearing or investigation within 60 working days thereafter, and shall provide a copy of the findings to the complaining employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer and to the appropriate supervisors, administrator, or employer. This hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Section 18671.2 of the Government Code, this part, and the rules of practice and procedure of the State Personnel Board. When the allegations contained in a complaint of reprisal or retaliation are the same as, or similar to, those contained in another appeal, the executive officer may consolidate the appeals into the most appropriate format. In these cases, the time limits described in this paragraph shall not apply.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18671.2 of the Government Code, no costs associated with hearings of the State Personnel Board conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be charged to the board of governors. Instead, all of the costs associated with hearings of the State Personnel Board conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be charged directly to the community college district that employs the complaining employee, or with whom the complaining applicant for employment has filed his or her employment application.

(d) If the findings of the executive officer of the State Personnel Board set forth acts of alleged misconduct by the supervisor, community college administrator, or public school employer, the supervisor, administrator, or employer may request a hearing before the State Personnel Board regarding the findings of the executive officer. The request for hearing and any subsequent determination by the board shall be made in accordance with the board’s usual rules governing appeals, hearings, investigations, and disciplinary proceedings.

(e) If, after the hearing, the State Personnel Board determines that a violation of Section 87163 occurred, or if no hearing is requested and the findings of the executive officer conclude that improper activity has occurred, the board may order any appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, reinstatement, back pay, restoration of lost service credit if appropriate, and the expungement of any adverse records of the employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer who was the subject of the alleged acts of misconduct prohibited by Section 87163.

(f) Whenever the State Personnel Board determines that a supervisor, community college administrator, or public school employer has violated Section 87163, it shall cause an entry to that effect to be made in the supervisor’s, community college administrator’s, or public school employer’s official personnel records.

(g) In order for the Governor and the Legislature to determine the need to continue or modify personnel procedures as they relate to the investigations of reprisals or retaliation for the disclosure of information by employees, the State Personnel Board, by June 30 of each year, shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature regarding complaints filed, hearings held, and legal actions taken pursuant to this section.

(h) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, a person who intentionally engages in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against an employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer for having made a protected disclosure shall be liable in an action for damages brought against him or her by the injured party. Punitive damages may be awarded by the court where the acts of the offending party are proven to be malicious. Where liability has been established, the injured party shall also be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees as provided by law. However, an action for damages shall not be available to the injured party unless the injured party has first filed a complaint with the local law enforcement agency. Nothing in this subdivision requires an injured party to file a complaint with the State Personnel Board prior to seeking relief for damages in a court of law.

(i) This section is not intended to prevent a public school employer, school administrator, or supervisor from taking, failing to take, directing others to take, recommending, or approving a personnel action with respect to an employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer if the public school employer, school administrator, or supervisor reasonably believes an action or inaction is justified on the basis of evidence separate and apart from the fact that the person has made a protected disclosure as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 87162.

(j) In any civil action or administrative proceeding, once it has been demonstrated by a preponderance of evidence that an activity protected by this article was a contributing factor in the alleged retaliation against a former, current, or prospective employee, the burden of proof shall be on the supervisor, school administrator, or public school employer to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the alleged action would have occurred for legitimate, independent reasons even if the employee had not engaged in protected disclosures or refused an illegal order. If the supervisor, school administrator, or public school employer fails to meet this burden of proof in an adverse action against the employee in any administrative review, challenge, or adjudication in which retaliation has been demonstrated to be a contributing factor, the employee shall have a complete affirmative defense in the adverse action.

(k) Nothing in this article shall be deemed to diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies of an employee under any other federal or state law or under an employment contract or collective bargaining agreement.
